Louisiana, session 2026, HB470.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 11-B of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:1821 through 1830, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 11-B. THE LOUISIANA WORKFORCE AND DEVELOPMENT EQUITY
AND OPPORTUNITY ACT
§1821. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Workforce
and Development Equity and Opportunity Act".
§1822. Legislative findings and purpose
A. The legislature hereby finds all of the following:
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470
(1) Louisiana's economy is undergoing significant transformation, with rapid
growth projected in clean energy, information technology, healthcare, and advanced
manufacturing sectors.
(2) African American and other minority workers are systematically
underrepresented in these high-wage growth sectors, resulting in a perpetuation and
widening of the racial income gap.
(3) The primary barriers to minority participation in these sectors include
access to credentialing programs, geographic proximity to training, costs of living
during training, and historical exclusion from apprenticeship and industry networks.
(4) Targeted workforce development investment represents the
highest-return strategy for long-term wealth building in minority communities.
B. It is the purpose of this Chapter to provide targeted workforce
development grants and support services to prepare underrepresented Louisianans
for high-wage employment in growth sectors.
§1823. Definitions
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Works.
(2) "High-growth sector" means any of the following industries identified
by the department as projecting ten percent or greater employment growth over the
succeeding five years in this state:
(a) Clean and renewable energy including solar, wind, battery storage, and
energy efficiency.
(b) Information technology and cybersecurity.
(c) Healthcare and healthcare technology.
(d) Advanced manufacturing and industrial technology.
(e) Logistics and supply chain technology.
(3) "Program" means the Louisiana Workforce Equity and Opportunity
Program established pursuant to this Chapter.
(4) "Targeted participant" means an individual who meets all of the
following requirements:
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470
(a) Is a resident of this state.
(b) Has a household income at or below one hundred and fifty percent of the
federal poverty level.
(c) Is a member of a population underrepresented in the applicable
high-growth sector, as determined by the department using current sector
demographic data.
(5) "Training provider" means a community college, technical college,
Historically Black College and University, registered apprenticeship program, or
industry-certified training program approved by the department to deliver
high-growth sector training.
§1824. Louisiana Workforce Equity and Opportunity Program; establishment
A. There is hereby established the Louisiana Workforce Equity and
Opportunity Program herein referred to as "the program", which shall be
administered by the department in coordination with Louisiana Economic
Development and the Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
B. The program shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide grants to eligible training providers to develop and deliver
high-growth sector training programs designed for and accessible to targeted
participants.
(2) Provide direct financial support to targeted participants enrolled in
approved training programs.
(3) Establish employer partnerships to create guaranteed interview pathways
from program completion to employment.
(4) Develop bridge programs and supplemental supports to address barriers
to participation and completion.
§1825. Training provider grants
A. The department shall award competitive grants to approved training
providers for any of the following purposes:
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470
(1) Developing or expanding high-growth sector training curricula aligned
with industry credentials.
(2) Providing equipment, technology, and infrastructure needed to deliver
training.
(3) Providing salaries of qualified instructors with industry experience.
(4) Providing outreach and recruitment in targeted communities.
(5) Providing wraparound services including childcare partnerships,
transportation assistance, and tutoring.
B. Grant amounts shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars per
program per fiscal year.
C. Grant recipients shall demonstrate that a minimum of sixty percent of
enrolled participants in each funded program are targeted participants.
D. Grants shall be conditioned on training providers maintaining employer
partnerships that provide all of the following:
(1) Guaranteed interviews to all program graduates.
(2) Prevailing wage employment upon successful completion.
(3) Mentorship and on-the-job training for program graduates during their
first year of employment.
§1826. Participant support grants
A. The department shall provide direct financial support to targeted
participants enrolled in approved training programs for any of the following:
(1) Training cost stipend: Up to five thousand dollars per participant per
program toward tuition, fees, books, and materials not covered by federal financial
aid.
(2) Living expense stipend: Up to one thousand dollars per month for the
duration of training, not to exceed twelve months.
(3) Certification examination fees: Full coverage of the cost of
industry-standard certification examinations upon completion of training.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470
B. Participant support grants shall not be considered taxable income for
purposes of state income tax.
§2167. Priority in grant selection towards Historically Black Colleges and
Universities; community colleges
The department shall give priority in grant selection to training programs
offered by Historically Black Colleges and Universities herein referred to as
"HBCU" and community and technical colleges located in parishes with high
concentrations of low- or moderate-income households or minority residents. A
minimum of thirty percent of total program grants shall be awarded to
HBCU-affiliated training programs.
§1828. Industry Advisory Council; established; membership
A. The department shall establish an Industry Advisory Council herein
referred to as "the council" for each designated high-growth sector consisting of all
of the following members:
(1) Representatives of at least five major employers in the sector operating
in this state.
(2) Representatives of labor unions or worker organizations, if applicable.
(3) Representatives of approved training providers.
(4) At least two representatives of communities disproportionately
underrepresented in the sector.
(5) A representative designated by the department.
B. Each council shall meet quarterly and shall advise the department on
curriculum alignment, employer hiring needs, credentialing standards, and the
effectiveness of the program.
§1829. Funding and appropriation
A. There is hereby appropriated funds from the Incumbent Worker Training
Program and other funds as designated for workforce development programs, subject
to appropriation by the legislature, ten million dollars annually for the program.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470
B. The department shall actively pursue federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act (WIOA) funds and other federal workforce grants to supplement
program funding.
C. Funding for the program shall be allocated as follows:
(1) Training provider grants: sixty percent.
(2) Participant support grants: thirty percent.
(3) Administration, evaluation, and reporting: ten percent.
§1830. Performance metrics and reporting
A. The department shall establish performance benchmarks for each funded
training program, including but not limited to all of the following:
(1) Program completion rate goal: eighty percent or higher.
(2) Credential attainment rate goal: eighty-five percent or higher.
(3) Job placement rate within ninety days of completion goal: seventy-five
percent or higher.
(4) Average wage of placed program graduates goal: one hundred twenty
percent or higher of pre-program wages.
(5) Employer retention rate at twelve months goal: seventy percent or
higher.
B. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later
than January first of each year detailing program performance, participant
demographics, employer partnerships, and recommendations for improvement.
C. Grant funding shall be reduced or terminated for training providers that
fail to meet benchmarks for two consecutive years, absent documented extraordinary
circumstances.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1293 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 470